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DIASF-01

DTC C 1549 /49 Vehicle Skid Control System Commu-
nication Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The VGRS ECU communicates with the skid control ECU. However, if any problems in this communication
occur, the VGRS ECU turns on the warning light, records the DTC and stops VGRS operation.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

¢ Wire harness and connector
*VGRSECU
« Skid control ECU

The system detects a communication malfunction from the

C1549/49 skid control ECU for 3 seconds.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkthe signal waveform.

VGRS ECU
/

F17859

PREPARATION:

Startthe engine.

CHECK:

(@) Using an oscilloscope, check the waveform between
VSC+ and GND of the VGRS ECU.

OK:
High and Low

(b) Usingan oscilloscope, check the waveform between

VSC- and GND ofthe VGRS ECU.

C 1V/DIV, 1 ms/DIV

4 GND

F1797|

OK:
High and Low

y

|

Proceed to step

LAND CRUISER (W/G

2

) SUP  (RM970E)

0K> Replace VGRS ECU.
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2 Check for an open or short circuit in the harness and connector between termi-
nals VSC+ and VSC- of the VGRS ECU, and between terminals VSC+ and VSC-
of the skid control ECU (See page IN-38).

PREPARATION:
VGRS ECU connector (@ Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(V17) VSC+ (b) Disconnectthe VGRS ECU connector (V17) and the skid
control ECU connector (A55).
CHECK:
2|34y s|e| e |oqo Check continuity betweenterminal VSC+andVSC - ofthe
12]13[14]15]16/17]18 [19]20]21 (22 VGRS ECU and skid control ECU.
OK:
, VSC- Continuity
Skid Control ECU connector
(A55)
| e—
1
11213415 617
8 |9 J1011 J12 131415
16 1/7 181920 f21)22
/
/
VSC+ VSC-
F17863
NG Repair or replace harness and connector.
OK \
3Checkforashorttogroundinthe VSC+andVSC - circuit.

OK:

No short to ground.

NG> Repair or replace harness and connector.

@

Replace skid control ECU.
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